Utah statutes.
4-9-3.   Weights and measures -- Systems used -- Basic units, tables, and
equivalents as published by National Institute of Standards and Technology.
(1)  The department shall use the same system of weights and measures that is
customarily used in the United States, and the metric system of weights and
measures.
(2)  Either system may be used for commercial purposes in the state.
(3)  The definitions of basic units of weight and measure, the tables of
weight and measure, and the weights and measures equivalents published by the
National Institute of Standards and Technology, shall determine the weights
and measures systems used within the state.
